scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_V.yaml
     aapiji-wiidige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaapiji-wiidige
     aapiji-wiidige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aapiji-wiidige
     aapiji-wiidige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aapiji-wiidiged
     aapiji-wiidige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaapiji-wiidiged
     aapijibizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaapijibiz
     aapijibizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaapijibiz
     aapijibizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaapijibiz
     aapijibizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aapijibizo
     aapijibizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aapijibizod
     aapijinizhimo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaapijinizhim
     aapijinizhimo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaapijinizhim
     aapijinizhimo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaapijinizhim
     aapijinizhimo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aapijinizhimo
     aapijinizhimo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aapijinizhimod
     aapijinizhimo+VAI+Particip+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaapijinizhimod
     aapijiskwagizi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aapijiskwagizi
     aapijiskwagizi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aapijiskwagizid
     aapijiskwagizi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaapijiskwagizid
     aasonige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaasonige
     aasonige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaasonige
     aasonige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aasonige
     aasonige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aasoniged
     aasonige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaasoniged
     aaswabi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaaswab
     aaswabi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaaswab
     aaswabi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aaswabid
     aaswaakogaabawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaaswaakogaabaw
     aaswaakogaabawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aaswaakogaabawi 
     aaswaakogaabawi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aaswaakogaabawid
     aatawe'ige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaatawe'ige
     aatawe'ige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaatawe'ige
     aatawe'ige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aatawe'ige
     aatawe'ige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aatawe'iged
     aatawe'ishkodawe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aatawe'ishkodawe
     aatawe'ishkodawe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aatawe'ishkodawed
     aate'ige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaate'ige
     aate'ige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aate'ige
     aate'ige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aate'iged
     aatenaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aatenaagozi
     aatenaagozi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aatenaagozid
     aatenaagozi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaatenaagozid
     aateshkodawe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaateshkodawe
     aateshkodawe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aateshkodawe
     aateshkodawe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aateshkodawed
     aateshkodawe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaateshkodawed
     aateyaashi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aateyaashi
     aateyaashi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aateyaashid
     aatwaakogaabawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaatwaakogaabaw
     aatwaakogaabawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaatwaakogaabaw
     aatwaakogaabawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaatwaakogaabaw
     aatwaakogaabawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaatwaakogaabaw
     aatwaakogaabawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aatwaakogaabawi 
     aatwaakogaabawi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aatwaakogaabawid
     aatwaakogaabawi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaatwaakogaabawid
     aatwaakwabi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaatwaakwab
     aatwaakwabi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aatwaakwabi
     aatwaakwabi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aatwaakwabid
     aatwaakwabi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaatwaakwabid
     aatwaakwabi+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: aatwaakwabin
     aawadashkosiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaawadashkosiwe
     aawadashkosiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawadashkosiwe
     aawadashkosiwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawadashkosiwed
     aawadashkosiwe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaawadashkosiwed
     aawadaaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaawadaas
     aawadaaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaawadaas
     aawadaaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaawadaas
     aawadaaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawadaaso
     aawadaaso+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawadaasod
     aawadaaso+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaawadaasod
     aawadaatigwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaawadaatigwe
     aawadaatigwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaawadaatigwe
     aawadaatigwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawadaatigwe
     aawadaatigwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawadaatigwed
     aawadinise+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaawadinise
     aawadinise+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaawadinise
     aawadinise+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaawadinise
     aawadinise+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaawadinise
     aawadinise+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawadinise
     aawadinise+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawadinised
     aawajibingwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaawajibingwe
     aawajibingwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajibingwe
     aawajibingwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajibingwed
     aawajibingwe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaawajibingwed
     aawajibingwe+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: aawajibingwen
     aawajigaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajigaazo
     aawajigaazo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajigaazod
     aawajige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaawajige
     aawajige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajige
     aawajige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajiged
     aawajige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaawajiged
     aawajimine+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaawajimine
     aawajimine+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaawajimine
     aawajimine+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaawajimine
     aawajimine+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajimine
     aawajimine+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajimined
     aawajimine+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaawajimined
     aawajimiijime+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaawajimiijime
     aawajimiijime+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajimiijime
     aawajimiijime+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajimiijimed
     aawajinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaawajinige
     aawajinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaawajinige
     aawajinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaawajinige
     aawajinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaawajinige
     aawajinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajinige
     aawajinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajiniged
     aawajinige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaawajiniged
     aawajiwane+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaawajiwane
     aawajiwane+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaawajiwane
     aawajiwane+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaawajiwane
     aawajiwane+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajiwane
     aawajiwane+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajiwaned
     aawajiwiisiniwine+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaawajiwiisiniwine
     aawajiwiisiniwine+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajiwiisiniwine
     aawajiwiisiniwine+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawajiwiisiniwined
     aawazhiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaawazhiwe
     aawazhiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaawazhiwe
     aawazhiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaawazhiwe
     aawazhiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawazhiwe
     aawazhiwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawazhiwed
     aawazhiwe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaawazhiwed
     aawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaaw
     aawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaaw
     aawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaaw
     aawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawi
     aawi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawid
     aawi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaawid
     aawikaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaawikaaz
     aawikaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaawikaaz
     aawikaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawikaazo
     aawikaazo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aawikaazod
     aawikaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaawikaaz
     aayaatwaakogaabawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaayaatwaakogaabaw
     aayaatwaakogaabawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaayaatwaakogaabaw
     aayaatwaakogaabawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aayaatwaakogaabawi
     aayaazhawaabiigiwebishikige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaayaazhawaabiigiwebishikige
     aayaazhawaabiigiwebishikige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aayaazhawaabiigiwebishikige
     aayaazhawaabiigiwebishikige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aayaazhawaabiigiwebishikiged
     aayaazhawaabiigiwebishikige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayayaazhawaabiigiwebishikiged
     aazhawagaako+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawagaak
     aazhawagaako+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaazhawagaak
     aazhawagaako+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaako
     aazhawagaako+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaakod
     aazhawagaako+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaazhawagaakod
     aazhawagaakobizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaazhawagaakobiz
     aazhawagaakobizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawagaakobiz
     aazhawagaakobizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaakobizo
     aazhawagaakobizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaakobizod
     aazhawagaame+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawagaame
     aazhawagaame+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaame
     aazhawagaame+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaamed
     aazhawagaamebizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawagaamebiz
     aazhawagaamebizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawagaamebiz
     aazhawagaamebizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaazhawagaamebiz
     aazhawagaamebizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaamebizo
     aazhawagaamebizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawagaamebizod
     aazhawa'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ndaazhawa'
     aazhawa'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawa'
     aazhawa'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaazhawa'
     aazhawa'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaazhawa'
     aazhawa'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawa'o 
     aazhawa'o+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawa'od
     aazhawa'o+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaazhawa'od
     aazhawa'oojigaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawa'oojigaazo
     aazhawa'oojigaazo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawa'oojigaazod
     aazhawa'oojigaazo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaazhawa'oojigaazod
     aazhawa'oojige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawa'oojige
     aazhawa'oojige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaazhawa'oojige
     aazhawa'oojige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawa'oojige
     aazhawa'oojige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawa'oojiged
     aazhawakwazhiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawakwazhiwe
     aazhawakwazhiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawakwazhiwe
     aazhawakwazhiwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: aazhawakwazhiweyaan
     aazhawakwazhiwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawakwazhiwed
     aazhawakwazhiwe+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: aazhawakwazhiwen
     aazhawaadagaako+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawaadagaak
     aazhawaadagaako+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawaadagaak
     aazhawaadagaako+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaazhawaadagaak
     aazhawaadagaako+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaadagaako
     aazhawaadagaako+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaadagaakod
     aazhawaadage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawaadage
     aazhawaadage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawaadage
     aazhawaadage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaazhawaadage
     aazhawaadage+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaadaged
     aazhawaakwiigwaashkoni+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaakwiigwaashkoni
     aazhawaakwiigwaashkoni+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaakwiigwaashkonid
     aazhawaakwiigwaashkoni+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaazhawaakwiigwaashkonid
     aazhawaandawe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawaandawe
     aazhawaandawe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawaandawe
     aazhawaandawe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaazhawaandawe
     aazhawaandawe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaazhawaandawe
     aazhawaandawe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaandawe
     aazhawaandawe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaandawed
     aazhawaandawe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaazhawaandawed
     aazhawaandawe+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: aazhawaandawen
     aazhawaandawe+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+Incl: aazhawaandawedaa
     aazhawaashi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niyaazhawaash
     aazhawaashi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaazhawaash
     aazhawaashi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawaash
     aazhawaashi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaashi
     aazhawaashi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawaashid
     aazhawaashi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaazhawaashid
     aazhawewesijige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaazhawewesijige
     aazhawewesijige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aazhawewesijige
